Utah statutes.
26-46-104.   Continuity between programs.
(1)  A contract entered into between the department and a scholarship or loan
repayment recipient under Title 26, Chapter 9, Part 2, Physicians and
Physician Assistants Grant and Scholarship Program, Title 26, Chapter 9d,
Nurse Education Financial Assistance, or Title 26,
Chapter 9e, Special Population Health Care Provider Financial Assistance and
Retention Act, prior to the effective date of this act, remains valid on and
after the effective date of this act, except that any provisions that cannot
be administered due to the repeal of these programs shall be administered
pursuant to Subsection 26-46-102(2)(g).
(2)  Applications in process on the effective date of this act, for
scholarship or loan repayment under Title 26, Chapter 9, Part 2, Physicians
and Physician Assistants Grant and Scholarship Program, Title 26, Chapter 9d,
Nurse Education Financial Assistance, or Title 26, Chapter 9e, Special
Population Health Care Provider Financial Assistance and Retention Act, shall
be evaluated for acceptance under the provisions of this chapter.
